Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Chapter 08. Common Interest Ownership.

Collateral references. —

15B Am. Jur. 2d, Condominiums and Co-operative Apartments, § 1 et seq.

Patrick J. Rohan, Home Owner Associations and Planned Unit Developments — Law and Practice: Forms (Matthew Bender).

Patrick J. Rohan, Cooperative Housing Law and Practice: Forms (Matthew Bender).